tr: Plak (ağızlık) uyumluluğu: Çift çene tepsisi; LED ağızlık tepsisi; Alt tepsi; Her mekana uygun; Üst tepsi; Diğer
ja: トレー互換性: デュアルアーチトレイ; LEDマウスピーストレイ; 下部トレイ; ユニバーサル; 上部トレイ; その他
el: Συμβατότητα δίσκου: Δίσκος διπλής αψίδας; Δίσκος επιστομίου LED; Κάτω δίσκος; Καθολικής χρήσης; Άνω δίσκος; Άλλο
lt-LT: Dėklo suderinamumas: Dvigubo lanko padėklas; LED kandiklio padėklas; Apatinis padėklas; Universalus; Viršutinis padėklas; Kita
nb: Kompatibilitet med blekeskinne: Dobbeltbuebrett; LED-munnstykke brett; Nedre brett; Universal; Øvre brett; Annet
zh-TW: 牙托相容性: 雙弓托盤; LED 咬嘴托盤; 下排托盤; 通用; 上排托盤; 其他
pl: Kompatybilność z nakładką: Nakładka na oba łuki; Nakładka LED do ust; Nakładka dolna; Uniwersalny; Nakładka górna; Inne
sv: Skenakompatibilitet: Dubbelkäksbricka; LED-munstyckesbricka; Underkäksbricka; Universell; Överkäksbricka; Övrigt
it: Compatibilità della mascherina: Mascherina doppia arcata; Mascherina LED; Mascherina inferiore; Universale; Mascherina superiore; Altro
ko: 트레이 호환성: 듀얼 아치 트레이; LED 마우스피스 트레이; 하단 트레이; 범용; 상단 트레이; 기타
fr: Compatibilité de la gouttière: Gouttière double arcade; Gouttière buccale LED; Gouttière inférieure; Universel; Gouttière supérieure; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost ladice: Dvostruka posuda; LED posuda za usta; Donja posuda; Univerzalno; Gornja posuda; Ostalo
hu: Fogfehérítő sínnel való kompatibilitás: Kettős íves tálca; LED szájdarab tálca; Alsó tálca; Általános; Felső tálca; Egyéb
pt-PT: Compatibilidade da moldeira: Moldeira de dupla arcada; Moldeira LED para boca; Moldeira inferior; Universal; Moldeira superior; Outro
nl: Lepel-compatibiliteit: Dubbele kaaklade; LED mondstuklade; Onderste lade; Universeel; Bovenste lade; Andere
pt-BR: Compatibilidade da moldeira: Moldeira dupla arcada; Moldeira com LED; Moldeira inferior; Universal; Moldeira superior; Outro
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของถาด: ถาดสองขากรรไกร; ถาดปากไฟ LED; ถาดล่าง; อเนกประสงค์; ถาดบน; อื่นๆ
de: Schienenkompatibilität: Doppelkiefer-Schiene; LED-Mundstück-Schiene; Unterkiefer-Schiene; Universell; Oberkiefer-Schiene; Sonstiges
ru: Совместимость кап: Двухчелюстная капа; LED-капа; Нижняя капа; Универсальное; Верхняя капа; Другой
cs: Kompatibilita tácku: Dvouoblouková miska; LED náústek; Spodní miska; Univerzální; Horní miska; Jiné
en: Tray compatibility: Dual-arch tray; LED mouthpiece tray; Lower tray; Universal; Upper tray; Other
es: Compatibilidad de la bandeja: Bandeja de arco dual; Bandeja de boquilla LED; Bandeja inferior; Universal; Bandeja superior; Otros
zh-CN: 托盘兼容性: 双牙弓托盘; LED 牙套托盘; 下牙托盘; 通用; 上牙托盘; 其他
ro-RO: Compatibilitate tavă: Tavă dublă arcade; Tavă bucală cu LED; Tavă inferioară; Universal; Tavă superioară; Altele
vi: Khả năng tương thích khay: Khay hai hàm; Khay miệng LED; Khay hàm dưới; Phổ quát; Khay hàm trên; Khác
sk-SK: Kompatibilita misky: Dvojoblúková tácka; LED tácka náustku; Dolná tácka; Univerzálny; Horná tácka; Iné
sl-SI: Združljivost pladnja: Dvoločni pladenj; LED pladenj za usta; Spodnji pladenj; Univerzalno; Zgornji pladenj; Drugo
bg-BG: Съвместимост с шината: Двойна дъгова табличка; LED табличка за уста; Долна табличка; Универсален; Горна табличка; Други
fi: Alustan yhteensopivuus: Kaksikaaritarjotin; LED-suukappaletarjotin; Alatarjotin; Yleinen; Ylätarjotin; Muu
da: Bakkekompatibilitet: Dobbeltbuebakke; LED-mundstykke bakke; Underbakke; Universal; Overbakke; Andet